North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127B. Military Affairs.
Article 1. Military Property Sales Facilities.

§ 127B-1.
Military property sales facility defined.

Any person, partnership, association or corporation who engages in the business of selling, consigning, purchasing, transferring or in any way acquiring military property for resale, is a “military property sales facility”. Specifically excluded are facilities operated by the United States Government, the State of North Carolina or any of its agencies and persons, partnerships, associations or corporations selling or purchasing military property pursuant to a contract with the United States Government, the State of North Carolina or any of its agencies.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1.

§ 127B-2.
Military property defined.

“Military property” means property originally manufactured for the United States or State of North Carolina which is a type and kind issued for use in, or furnished and intended for, the Armed Forces of the United States or the militia of the State of North Carolina.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 91.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 91, effective June 20, 2011, substituted “Armed Forces” for “military service.”

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Item manufactured for commercial sale, such as camouflage clothing, is not “military property”

within the meaning of this section. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 42 (1985).

Property such as a desk,

which is of a type and kind issued for use in or furnished and intended for the military service of the United States or the militia of this State, is nonetheless not “military property” within the meaning of this Article if it was not originally manufactured for the United States or this State. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 42 (1985).

Article is not intended to cover sales and purchases of obsolete military property.

See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable William N. Martin, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 31 (1985).

The term “military property,” as defined in this Article, does not include property originally manufactured for use by the United States military or the North Carolina militia, but which is of a type and kind no longer issued for use in or furnished to the personnel of such military services. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable William N. Martin, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 31 (1985).

If a person, firm or corporation deals only in military property purchased directly from the United States government or this State pursuant to written contract, then that person, firm or corporation is not required to be licensed by this Article. However, the items purchased, if they are indeed “military property” within the meaning of this section, would nevertheless be subject to recording and reporting requirements by military property sales facilities which might later purchase them. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 42 (1985).

§ 127B-3.
License.

No person, partnership, association or corporation shall engage in the business of selling military property or purchasing military property for resale without first having obtained a license to do so from the local governing body of the city, town, or county in which it is located and by paying the county, State, and municipal tax required by law, and otherwise complying with the requirements made in this and succeeding sections. The license shall be posted in a prominent place, easily visible to the public, on the designated premises.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sales facility need not get separate license from both county and city.

If the facility is in a city or town, it can obtain the license from the city or town government. If it is not in a city or town, then it must obtain the license from the county. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C.A.G 42 (1985).

County may charge fee for issuing licenses.

See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Garris N. Yarborough, Cumberland County Attorney, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 41 (1985).

§ 127B-4.
Local governing authorities to grant and control license; bond.

The governing body of any city, town, or county in this State may grant to such person, partnership, association or corporation as who shall produce satisfactory evidence of good character, a license authorizing such person, partnership, association or corporation to carry on the business of a military property sales facility. The license shall designate the building in which the person, partnership, association or corporation shall carry on the business, and no person, partnership, association or corporation shall carry on the business of a military property sales facility without being duly licensed, nor in any other building than the one designated in the license.

Any person or the principal officers of any association or corporation or all the partners of any partnership applying for a license shall furnish the governing body the following information:

Full name, and any other names used by the applicant during the preceding five years, or in the case of a partnership, association or corporation, the applicant shall list any partnership, association, or corporate names used during the preceding five years;

Current address, and all addresses used by the applicant during the preceding five years;

Physical description;

Age;

Driver’s license number, if any, and state of issuance;

Recent color photograph;

Record of felony convictions; and

Record of other convictions during the preceding five years.

Every person, partnership, association or corporation so licensed to carry on the business of a military property sales facility shall, at the time of receiving a license, file with the governing body of the city, town, or county granting the license, a bond payable to the city, town, or county in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), to be executed by the person licensed and by two responsible sureties, or a surety company licensed to do business in the State of North Carolina, to be approved of by the governing body. The bond shall be for the faithful performance of the requirements and obligations pertaining to the business licensed. The governing body, may revoke the license and sue for forfeiture of the bond upon a breach of the licensee’s duties under the bond. Any person who may obtain a judgment against a military property sales facility and upon which judgment execution is returned unsatisfied may maintain an action in his own name upon the bond of the military property sales facility, in any court having jurisdiction of the amount demanded to satisfy the judgment.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Subsection (a) does not prohibit a military property sales facility from purchasing military property at the place of business of another military property sales facility. However, the purchasing facility would have to make a record of the transaction in compliance with

G.S. 127B-6(a)

. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 42 (1985).

§ 127B-5.
Perjury; punishment.

Any person who shall willfully commit perjury in any application for a permit pursuant to this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 939; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 127B-6.
Records to be kept.

Every military property sales facility owner shall keep a book in which shall be legibly written, at the time of each transaction involving the acquisition by any means of used or new military property by the military property sales facility owner, his employee or agent, from any person, partnership, association or corporation, the following information:

An account and description of the used or new military property including if applicable, the manufacturer’s name, the model, the model number, the serial number of the property, and any engraved numbers or initials found on the property. Property lacking any identifying mark or characteristic shall be marked by the military property sales facility owner in such a way as to allow clear identification of the property.

The amount of money paid;

The date of the transaction; and

The name and residence of the person selling, consigning or transferring the used or new military property.

The military property sales facility owner, or his employee or agent shall require that the person selling the new or used military property, to present two forms of positive identification to him before the military property sales facility personnel may complete any transaction regarding the buying, consigning or acquiring of new or used military property. The presentation of any one state or federal government issued identification containing a photographic representation imprinted on it shall constitute compliance with the identification requirements of this paragraph. The military property sales facility owner or his employee or agent shall legibly record this identification information next to the person’s name and residence in the book required to be kept. Both the military property sales facility owner, his employee or agent and the seller, consignor or transferor of the military property shall sign the record entry.

The book shall be a permanent record to be kept at all times on the premises of the place of business of the military property sales facility and shall be made available, during regular business hours, to any law enforcement officer who requests to inspect the book. A copy of the records required to be kept by this section shall be filed within 48 hours of the transaction in the office of the local law enforcement agency serving the city, town, or county which issued the license to the military. Mailing the required copy to the local law enforcement agency within 48 hours shall constitute compliance with this section.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Orders shipped to facility from out of state must be recorded and reported

in compliance with paragraphs (a) and (c), just as other transactions by mail must be. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 42 (1985).

G.S. 127B-4(a)

does not prohibit a military property sales facility from purchasing military property at the place of business of another military property sales facility. However, the purchasing facility would have to make a record of the transaction in compliance with paragraph (a). See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 42 (1985).

If military property sales facility purchases items by lot,

for example 100 pounds of wool scrap, each scrap need not be listed separately. However, each of the items of scrap should be tagged so that their origin in that lot is discernable. Moreover, where the property has a model number, serial number and/or manufacturer’s name, that information must be recorded. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 42 (1985).

Record-keeping book called for by paragraph (a) may be loose-leaf.

See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Paul M. Starzynski, Member, Onslow County Board of Commissioners, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 42 (1985).

§ 127B-7.
Penalties.

Any dealer who violates the provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. In addition, any dealer convicted of violating this Article shall be ineligible for a dealer’s permit for a period of three years from the date of conviction. Each violation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 940; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§§ 127B-8,
127B-9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.